Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.150

Branch offices.

The department may maintain such branch offices within the state as the director may deem necessary properly to carry out the powers and duties vested in the department.

[ 1965 c 156 s 15.]

NOTES:

Office of department, maintenance at state capital: RCW 43.17.050.